Vermont, session 2025-2026, H554.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1103 is amended to read:
§ 1103. ELIGIBILITY AND BENEFIT LEVELS
* * *
(c) The Commissioner shall adopt rules for the determination of eligibility
for the Reach Up program and benefit levels for all participating families that
include the following provisions:
* * *
(5)(A) The asset limitation shall be $9,000.00 for families for the
purposes of determining initial and continuing eligibility for the Reach Up
VT LEG #386110 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.554
2026 Page 2 of 2
program, and the following savings accounts shall not be considered in the
calculation for determining the asset limitation:
(i) a retirement account, such as an individual retirement
arrangement (IRA), a defined contribution plan qualified under 26 U.S.C. §
401(k), or any similar account as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 408; and
(ii) a qualified child education savings account, such as the
Vermont Higher Education Investment Plan, established in 16 V.S.A. § 2877,
or any similar plan qualified under 26 U.S.C. § 529. [Repealed.]
(B) The value of assets accumulated from the earnings of adults and
children in participating families and from any federal or Vermont earned
income tax credit shall be excluded for purposes of determining continuing
eligibility for the Reach Up program.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386110 v.1